Wyoming, session 2026, HB0029.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-303(a) is amended to read:

23-2-303. Trapping licenses; tagging; traps and
snares; penalty; confiscation; inspection; interference
with trapping.

(a) Any person may, in the discretion of the
department upon application and the payment of the proper
fee, receive a license to trap any furbearing animal. The
HB0029

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0271
department shall issue a trapping license to a nonresident
only if his state issues licenses to Wyoming residents to
trap the same species for which residents of that state may
be licensed to trap in that state. Any nonresident applying
for a Wyoming trapping license shall furnish all of the
following are met:

(i) A notarized affidavit stating the
applicant's legal address including his The species applied
for can be lawfully trapped in the applicant's state of
residence; and

(ii) A copy of the most current statutes or
rules and regulations of the applicant's state of residence
which show that the state issues nonresident trapping
licenses which authorize Wyoming residents to trap the same
species for which residents of that The applicant's state
may be licensed to trap in that state issues nonresident
trapping licenses that authorize Wyoming residents to trap
the same species that residents of that state may be
licensed to trap;.

HB0029

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0271
(iii) The applicant furnishes all of the
following to the department:

(A) A notarized affidavit stating the
applicant's legal address, including the applicant's state
of residence;

(B) A copy of the most current statutes or
rules and regulations of the applicant's state of residence
that show that the applicant's state issues nonresident
trapping licenses that authorize Wyoming residents to trap
the same species for which residents of that state may be
licensed to trap in that state.

Section 2. The game and fish department shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0029

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0271
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0029